Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201257-1410
Rules and regulations.

The commission
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Major Oil
Pipeline Siting Act.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 11.